Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Chapter 38. The Regulation of Marijuana.

Editor’s notes. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, which enacted this chapter, was approved by the voters at the general election of November 4, 2014.
The results of the general election were certified by the Lieutenant Governor November 26, 2014.
Under art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative’s provisions took effect February 24, 2015.

Section 3, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted this chapter, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable, and, except where otherwise indicated in the text, shall supersede conflicting statutes, local charter, ordinance, or resolution, and other state and local provisions.
If any provisions of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is found to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Sec. 17.38.010.
Purpose and findings.

In the interest of allowing law enforcement to focus on violent and property crimes, and to enhance individual freedom, the people of the state of Alaska find and declare that the use of marijuana should be legal for persons 21 years of age or older.

In the interest of the health and public safety of our citizenry, the people of the state of Alaska further find and declare that the production and sale of marijuana should be regulated so that

individuals will have to show proof of age before purchasing marijuana;

legitimate, taxpaying business people, and not criminal actors, will conduct sales of marijuana; and

marijuana sold by regulated businesses will be labeled and subject to additional regulations to ensure that consumers are informed and protected.

The people of the state of Alaska further declare that the provisions of this Act are not intended to diminish the right to privacy as interpreted by the Alaska Supreme Court in Ravin v. State of Alaska.

Nothing in this Act proposes or intends to require any individual or entity to engage in any conduct that violates federal law, or exempt any individual or entity from any requirement of federal law, or pose any obstacle to federal enforcement of federal law.

History.

(§ 1 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2)

Revisor's notes. —

Minor editorial changes were made to this section, enacted by 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, to conform capitalization, punctuation, and numbering to the style of the Alaska Statutes.

Editor's notes. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, which enacted this section, was approved by the voters at the general election of November 4, 2014.
The results of the general election were certified by the Lieutenant Governor November 26, 2014.
Under
art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative’s provisions took effect February 24, 2015.

Section 3, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable, and, except where otherwise indicated in the text, shall supersede conflicting statutes, local charter, ordinance, or resolution, and other state and local provisions.
If any provisions of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is found to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

The citation for Ravin v. State of Alaska, referred to in subsection (c), is

Ravin v. State,

537 P.2d 494 (Alaska 1975).

Sec. 17.38.020.
Personal use of marijuana.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the following acts, by persons 21 years of age or older, are lawful and are not criminal or civil offenses under state law or the law of any political subdivision of the state or a basis for seizure or forfeiture of assets under state law:

possessing, using, displaying, purchasing, or transporting marijuana accessories or one ounce or less of marijuana;

possessing, growing, processing, or transporting not more than six marijuana plants, with three or fewer being mature, flowering plants, and possession of the marijuana produced by the plants on the premises where the plants were grown, except that not more than 12 marijuana plants, with six or fewer being mature, flowering plants, may be present in a single dwelling regardless of the number of persons 21 years of age or older residing in the dwelling;

transferring one ounce or less of marijuana and up to six immature marijuana plants to a person who is 21 years of age or older without remuneration;

consumption of marijuana, except that nothing in this chapter permits the consumption of marijuana in public; and

assisting, aiding, or supporting another person who is 21 years of age or older in any of the acts described in (1) — (4) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2; am § 1 ch 53 SLA 2016; am § 57 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Minor editorial changes were made to this section, enacted by 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, to conform capitalization, punctuation, and numbering to the style of the Alaska Statutes.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 29, 2016, in the introductory language, substituted “are not criminal or civil offenses” for ”shall not be a criminal or civil offense”, substituted ”bases” for “be a basis” preceding “for seizure”; in (2), inserted “, except that not more than 12 marijuana plants, with six or fewer being mature, flowering plants, may be present in a single dwelling regardless of the number of persons 21 years of age or older residing in the dwelling” following “were grown”; in (5), inserted “, aiding, or supporting” following “assisting”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in the introductory language substituted “state” or “the state” for “Alaska”, and substituted “a basis” for “bases” preceding “for seizure”.

Editor's notes. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, which enacted this section, was approved by the voters at the general election of November 4, 2014.
The results of the general election were certified by the Lieutenant Governor November 26, 2014.
Under
art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative's provisions took effect February 24, 2015.

Section 3, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable, and, except where otherwise indicated in the text, shall supersede conflicting statutes, local charter, ordinance, or resolution, and other state and local provisions.
If any provisions of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is found to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Sec. 17.38.030.
Restrictions on personal cultivation, penalty.

The personal cultivation of marijuana described in AS

17.38.020

(2) is subject to the following terms:

marijuana plants shall be cultivated in a location where the plants are not subject to public view without the use of binoculars, aircraft, or other optical aids;

a person who cultivates marijuana must take reasonable precautions to ensure the plants are secure from unauthorized access;

marijuana cultivation may only occur on property lawfully in possession of the cultivator or with the consent of the person in lawful possession of the property.

A person who violates this section while otherwise acting in compliance with AS

17.38.020

(2) is guilty of a violation punishable by a fine of up to $750.

History.

(§ 1 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor editorial changes were made to this section, enacted by 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, to conform capitalization, punctuation, and numbering to the style of the Alaska Statutes.

Editor’s notes. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, which enacted this section, was approved by the voters at the general election of November 4, 2014.
The results of the general election were certified by the Lieutenant Governor November 26, 2014.
Under
art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative’s provisions took effect February 24, 2015.

Section 3, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable, and, except where otherwise indicated in the text, shall supersede conflicting statutes, local charter, ordinance, or resolution, and other state and local provisions.
If any provisions of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is found to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Sec. 17.38.040.
Public consumption banned, penalty.

It is unlawful to consume marijuana in public. A person who violates this section is guilty of a violation punishable by a fine of up to $100.

History.

(§ 1 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2)

Editor’s notes. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, which enacted this section, was approved by the voters at the general election of November 4, 2014.
The results of the general election were certified by the Lieutenant Governor November 26, 2014.
Under
art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative’s provisions took effect February 24, 2015.

Section 3, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable, and, except where otherwise indicated in the text, shall supersede conflicting statutes, local charter, ordinance, or resolution, and other state and local provisions.
If any provisions of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is found to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

Interpreting the prohibition of public consumption of marijuana at “places of amusement or business”, the attorney general concluded that individuals may not consume marijuana at a club or other place that charges a fee for entry or consumption unless the place is licensed as a retail marijuana store under state law. 2016 Op. Alaska Att’y. Gen. (Aug. 31).

Sec. 17.38.050.
False identification, penalty.

A person who is under 21 years of age may not present or offer to a marijuana establishment or the marijuana establishment’s agent or employee any written or oral evidence of age that is false, fraudulent, or not actually the person’s own, for the purpose of

purchasing, attempting to purchase, or otherwise procuring or attempting to procure marijuana or marijuana products; or

gaining access to a marijuana establishment.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a violation punishable by a fine of up to $400.

History.

(§ 1 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor editorial changes were made to this section, enacted by 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, to conform capitalization, punctuation, and numbering to the style of the Alaska Statutes.

Editor’s notes. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, which enacted this section, was approved by the voters at the general election of November 4, 2014.
The results of the general election were certified by the Lieutenant Governor November 26, 2014.
Under
art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative’s provisions took effect February 24, 2015.

Section 3, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable, and, except where otherwise indicated in the text, shall supersede conflicting statutes, local charter, ordinance, or resolution, and other state and local provisions.
If any provisions of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is found to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Sec. 17.38.060.
Marijuana accessories authorized.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it is lawful and is not an offense under state law or the law of any political subdivision of the state or a basis for seizure or forfeiture of assets under state law for persons 21 years of age or older to manufacture, possess, or purchase marijuana accessories, or to distribute or sell marijuana accessories to a person who is 21 years of age or older.

History.

(§ 1 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2; am § 58 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, substituted “and is not an offense” for “and shall not be an offense” following “is lawful”; substituted “state” or “the state” for “Alaska” three times.

Editor's notes. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, which enacted this section, was approved by the voters at the general election of November 4, 2014.
The results of the general election were certified by the Lieutenant Governor November 26, 2014.
Under
art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative’s provisions took effect February 24, 2015.

Section 3, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable, and, except where otherwise indicated in the text, shall supersede conflicting statutes, local charter, ordinance, or resolution, and other state and local provisions.
If any provisions of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is found to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Sec. 17.38.070.
Lawful operation of marijuana-related facilities.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following acts, when performed by a retail marijuana store with a current, valid registration, or a person 21 years of age or older who is acting in the person’s capacity as an owner, employee, or agent of a retail marijuana store, are lawful and are not an offense under state law or a basis for seizure or forfeiture of assets under state law:

possessing, displaying, storing, or transporting marijuana or marijuana products, except that marijuana and marijuana products may not be displayed in a manner that is visible to the general public from a public right-of-way;

delivering or transferring marijuana or marijuana products to a marijuana testing facility;

receiving marijuana or marijuana products from a marijuana testing facility;

purchasing marijuana from a marijuana cultivation facility;

purchasing marijuana or marijuana products from a marijuana product manufacturing facility; and

delivering, distributing, or selling marijuana or marijuana products to consumers.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following acts, when performed by a marijuana cultivation facility with a current, valid registration, or a person 21 years of age or older who is acting in the person’s capacity as an owner, employee, or agent of a marijuana cultivation facility, are lawful and are not an offense under state law or a basis for seizure or forfeiture of assets under state law:

cultivating, manufacturing, harvesting, processing, packaging, transporting, displaying, storing, or possessing marijuana;

delivering or transferring marijuana to a marijuana testing facility;

receiving marijuana from a marijuana testing facility;

delivering, distributing, or selling marijuana to a marijuana cultivation facility, a marijuana product manufacturing facility, or a retail marijuana store;

receiving or purchasing marijuana from a marijuana cultivation facility; and

receiving marijuana seeds or immature marijuana plants from a person 21 years of age or older.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following acts, when performed by a marijuana product manufacturing facility with a current, valid registration, or a person 21 years of age or older who is acting in the person’s capacity as an owner, employee, or agent of a marijuana product manufacturing facility, are lawful and are not an offense under state law or a basis for seizure or forfeiture of assets under state law:

packaging, processing, transporting, manufacturing, displaying, or possessing marijuana or marijuana products;

delivering or transferring marijuana or marijuana products to a marijuana testing facility;

receiving marijuana or marijuana products from a marijuana testing facility;

delivering or selling marijuana or marijuana products to a retail marijuana store or a marijuana product manufacturing facility;

purchasing marijuana from a marijuana cultivation facility; and

purchasing marijuana or marijuana products from a marijuana product manufacturing facility.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following acts, when performed by a marijuana testing facility with a current, valid registration, or a person 21 years of age or older who is acting in the person’s capacity as an owner, employee, or agent of a marijuana testing facility, are lawful and are not an offense under state law or a basis for seizure or forfeiture of assets under state law:

possessing, cultivating, processing, repackaging, storing, transporting, displaying, transferring, or delivering marijuana;

receiving marijuana or marijuana products from a marijuana cultivation facility, a marijuana retail store, a marijuana products manufacturer, or a person 21 years of age or older; and

returning marijuana or marijuana products to a marijuana cultivation facility, a marijuana retail store, a marijuana products manufacturer, or a person 21 years of age or older.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it is lawful and is not an offense under state law or a basis for seizure or forfeiture of assets under state law to lease or otherwise allow the use of property owned, occupied, or controlled by any person, corporation, or other entity for any of the activities conducted lawfully in accordance with (a) — (d) of this section.

Nothing in this section prevents the imposition of penalties upon marijuana establishments for violating this chapter or rules adopted by the board or local governments pursuant to this chapter.

The provisions of AS

17.30.020

do not apply to marijuana establishments.

History.

(§ 1 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2; am §§
59 — 63 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Minor editorial changes were made to this section, enacted by 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, to conform capitalization, punctuation, and numbering to the style of the Alaska Statutes, and “the person’s” was substituted for “his or her” in four places “to avoid the use of pronouns denoting masculine or feminine gender” as provided in
AS

01.05.031

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in the introductory language in (a) through (e), substituted “and are not an offense” or similar, for “and shall not be an offense”; substituted “state” for “Alaska”.

Editor's notes. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, which enacted this section, was approved by the voters at the general election of November 4, 2014.
The results of the general election were certified by the Lieutenant Governor November 26, 2014.
Under
art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative’s provisions took effect February 24, 2015.

Section 3, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable, and, except where otherwise indicated in the text, shall supersede conflicting statutes, local charter, ordinance, or resolution, and other state and local provisions.
If any provisions of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is found to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Sec. 17.38.080.
Marijuana Control Board; appointment and qualifications.

The Marijuana Control Board is established in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development as a regulatory and quasi-judicial agency. The board is in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for administrative purposes only.

The board members shall be appointed by the governor and confirmed by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session. A member of the board may not hold any other state or federal office, either elective or appointive. The board consists of five voting members as follows:

one person from the public safety sector;

one person from the public health sector;

one person currently residing in a rural area;

one person actively engaged in the marijuana industry; and

one person who is either from the general public or actively engaged in the marijuana industry.

Not more than two members of the board may be engaged in the same business, occupation, or profession.

A board member representing the general public, the public safety sector, the public health sector, or a rural area, or the member’s immediate family member, may not have a financial interest in the marijuana industry.

In this section,

“financial interest” means holding, directly or indirectly, a legal or equitable interest in the operation of a business licensed under this chapter;

“immediate family member” means a spouse, child, or parent;

“marijuana industry” means a business or profession related to marijuana in which the person is lawfully engaged and that is in compliance with the provisions of state law, including this chapter and regulations adopted under this chapter;

“public health sector” means a state, federal, or local entity that works to ensure the health and safety of persons and communities through education, policymaking, treatment and prevention of injury and disease, and promotion of wellness;

“public safety sector” means a state, federal, or local law enforcement authority that provides for the welfare and protection of the general public through the enforcement of applicable laws;

“rural area” means a community with a population of 7,000 or less that is not connected by road or rail to Anchorage or Fairbanks, or with a population of 2,000 or less that is connected by road or rail to Anchorage or Fairbanks.

History.

(§ 2 ch 4 SLA 2015)

Cross references. —

For a transitional provision relating to regulations adopted by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board and to the authority of that board, see sec. 11, ch. 4, SLA 2015.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 5, 2015, repealed and reenacted the section, which read, “At any time, the legislature may create a Marijuana Control Board in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development or its successor agency to assume the power, duties, and responsibilities delegated to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board under this chapter.”

Editor’s notes. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, which enacted this section, was approved by the voters at the general election of November 4, 2014.
The results of the general election were certified by the Lieutenant Governor November 26, 2014.
Under
art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative’s provisions took effect February 24, 2015.

Section 3, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable, and, except where otherwise indicated in the text, shall supersede conflicting statutes, local charter, ordinance, or resolution, and other state and local provisions.
If any provisions of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is found to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Sec. 17.38.091.
Terms of office; chair.

Members of the board serve staggered three-year terms.

Except as provided in AS

39.05.080

(4), a member of the board serves until a successor is appointed.

A vacancy occurring in the membership of the board shall be filled within 30 days by appointment of the governor for the unexpired portion of the vacated term.

A member who has served all or part of three successive terms on the board may not be reappointed to the board unless three years have elapsed since the person has last served on the board.

The board shall select a chair from among its members.

History.

(§ 3 ch 4 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 17.38.081; renumbered in 2015.

Cross references. —

For a provision relating to initial terms and appointments to the Marijuana Control Board, see sec. 10, ch. 4, SLA 2015.

Effective dates. —

Section 12, ch. 4, SLA 2015 makes this section effective May 5, 2015.

Sec. 17.38.101.
Per diem and expenses.

Members of the board do not receive a salary but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized for boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 4 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 17.38.082; renumbered in 2015.

Effective dates. —

Section 12, ch. 4, SLA 2015 makes this section effective May 5, 2015.

Sec. 17.38.111.
Meetings.

The board shall meet at the call of the chair. The board shall also meet at least once each year in each judicial district of the state to study this chapter and existing board regulations in light of statewide and local issues. Unless impracticable, the board shall hold its regular meetings at the same location as and within 24 hours of the regular meetings of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board.

Three members of the board constitute a quorum for the conduct of business. A majority of the whole membership of the board must approve applications for new licenses, renewals, transfers, suspensions, and revocations of existing licenses, and product approvals as provided in regulations adopted by the board.

History.

(§ 3 ch 4 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 17.38.083; renumbered in 2015.

Cross references. —

For a provision relating to meetings of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, see AS

04.06.050

.

Effective dates. —

Section 12, ch. 4, SLA 2015 makes this section effective May 5, 2015.

Sec. 17.38.121.
Powers and duties of the board.

The board shall control the cultivation, manufacture, and sale of marijuana in the state. The board is vested with the powers and duties necessary to enforce this chapter.

The board shall

propose and adopt regulations;

establish by regulation the qualifications for licensure including fees and factors related to the applicant’s experience, criminal justice history, and financial interests;

review applications for licensure made under this chapter and may order the executive director to issue, renew, suspend, or revoke a license authorized under this chapter; and

hear appeals from actions of the director and from actions of officers and employees charged with enforcing this chapter and the regulations adopted under this chapter.

When considering an application for licensure, the board may reduce the area to be designated as the licensed premises from the area applied for if the board determines that a reduction in area is necessary to ensure control over the sale and consumption of marijuana on the premises or is otherwise in the public interest.

The board shall adopt regulations under this chapter in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

The board may employ, directly or through contracts with other departments and agencies of the state, enforcement agents and staff it considers necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The salaries of personnel of the board in the exempt service shall be set by the Department of Administration.

The board shall promptly notify all licensees and municipalities of major changes to this chapter and to regulations adopted under this chapter. However, if changes affect only specific classifications of licenses and permits, the board need only notify those licensees and municipalities directly affected by the changes. Current copies of this chapter and current copies of the regulations adopted under this chapter shall be made available at all offices in the state of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development and the detachment headquarters and posts maintained by the division of Alaska state troopers in the Department of Public Safety.

History.

(§ 3 ch 4 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 17.38.084; renumbered in 2015.

Effective dates. —

Section 12, ch. 4, SLA 2015 makes this section effective May 5, 2015.

Sec. 17.38.131.
Enforcement powers.

The director and the persons employed for the administration and enforcement of this chapter may, with the concurrence of the commissioner of public safety, exercise the powers of peace officers when those powers are specifically granted by the board. Powers granted by the board under this section may be exercised only when necessary for the enforcement of the criminally punishable provisions of this chapter, other criminal statutes relating to substances or activities regulated or permitted under this chapter, regulations of the board, and other criminally punishable laws and regulations relating to marijuana.

History.

(§ 3 ch 4 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 17.38.085; renumbered in 2015.

Effective dates. —

Section 12, ch. 4, SLA 2015 makes this section effective May 5, 2015.

Sec. 17.38.140.
Appointment and removal of director; staff.

The director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board appointed under AS

04.06.070

shall serve as the director of the board. The board may remove the director by a majority vote of the full membership of the board and a majority vote of the full membership of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board. The governor may remove the executive director as provided in AS

04.06.070

.

The paid staff of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board created in AS

04.06.010

shall also be the staff for the board.

History.

(§ 3 ch 4 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 17.38.086; renumbered in 2015.

Effective dates. —

Section 12, ch. 4, SLA 2015 makes this section effective May 5, 2015.

Sec. 17.38.150.
Duties of director.

The director shall enforce this chapter and regulations adopted by the board. The director shall issue, renew, transfer, suspend, or revoke all licenses and permits and issue product approvals at the direction of the board. The board may delegate to the director the authority to temporarily grant or deny the issuance, renewal, or transfer of licenses and permits. The director’s temporary grant or denial of the issuance, renewal, or transfer of a license or permit is not binding on the board. The board may delegate to the director any duty imposed by this chapter except its power to propose and adopt regulations.

History.

(§ 3 ch 4 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 17.38.087; renumbered in 2015.

Effective dates. —

Section 12, ch. 4, SLA 2015 makes this section effective May 5, 2015.

Sec. 17.38.190.
Rulemaking.

The board shall adopt regulations necessary for implementation of this chapter. Regulations under this subsection may not prohibit the operation of marijuana establishments, either expressly or through regulations that make their operation unreasonably impracticable. The regulations must include

procedures for the issuance, renewal, suspension, and revocation of a registration to operate a marijuana establishment; procedures under this paragraph are subject to all requirements of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act);

a schedule of application, registration, and renewal fees; application fees may not exceed $5,000, with this upper limit adjusted annually for inflation, unless the board determines a greater fee is necessary to carry out its responsibilities under this chapter;

qualifications for registration that are directly and demonstrably related to the operation of a marijuana establishment;

security requirements for marijuana establishments, including for the transportation of marijuana by marijuana establishments;

requirements to prevent the sale or diversion of marijuana and marijuana products to persons under the age of 21;

labeling requirements for marijuana and marijuana products sold or distributed by a marijuana establishment;

health and safety regulations and standards for the manufacture of marijuana products and the cultivation of marijuana;

reasonable restrictions on the advertising and display of marijuana and marijuana products; and

civil penalties for the failure to comply with regulations made under this chapter.

In order to ensure that individual privacy is protected, the board may not require a consumer to provide a retail marijuana store with personal information other than government-issued identification to determine the consumer’s age, and a retail marijuana store may not be required to acquire and record personal information about consumers.

History.

(§ 1 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2; am § 64 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 17.38.090; renumbered in 2015.

Minor editorial changes were made to this section, enacted by 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, to conform capitalization, punctuation, and numbering to the style of the Alaska Statutes, and “February 24, 2015” was substituted for “the effective date of this Act”.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (a), in the introductory language, at the beginning of the first sentence, deleted “Not later than nine months after February 24, 2015,” and made a related change, substituted “Regulations under this subsection may” for “Such regulations shall” at the beginning of the second sentence, substituted “The regulations must” for “Such regulations shall” at the beginning of the third sentence; in (a)(1), substituted “; procedures under this paragraph are” for “, with such procedures” following “marijuana establishment”; in (a)(2), substituted “; application fees shall” for “, provided, application fees shall” following “renewal fees”; made a stylistic change in (a)(9); in (b), substituted “may not require” for “shall not require” following “the board”, and “may not be required” for “shall not be required” following “retail marijuana store”.

Editor's notes. —

2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, which enacted this section, was approved by the voters at the general election of November 4, 2014.
The results of the general election were certified by the Lieutenant Governor November 26, 2014.
Under
art. XI, sec. 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the initiative’s provisions took effect February 24, 2015.

Section 3, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable, and, except where otherwise indicated in the text, shall supersede conflicting statutes, local charter, ordinance, or resolution, and other state and local provisions.
If any provisions of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is found to be invalid or unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”